Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2335.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) On and after January 1, 2026, any owner or lessee of
one or more passenger vehicles or trucks registered for a gross weight
of 20,000 pounds or less who is a resident of Kansas, upon compliance
with the provisions of this section, may be issued one hunter nation
license plate for each such passenger vehicle or truck. Such license
plate shall be issued for the same time as other license plates upon
proper registration and payment of the regular license fee as provided
in K.S.A. 8-143, and amendments thereto, and the payment to the
county treasurer of the logo use royalty payment.
(b) Hunter nation, inc., may authorize the use of the organization's
logo to be affixed on license plates as provided by this section. Any
motor vehicle owner or lessee shall pay an amount of not less than $25
nor more than $100, as determined by hunter nation, inc., as a logo use
royalty payment for each such license plate to be issued. The logo use
royalty payment shall be paid to the county treasurer.
(c) Any applicant for a license plate authorized by this section
may make application for such license plate not less than 60 days prior
to such person's renewal of registration date, on a form prescribed and
furnished by the director of vehicles, and any applicant for such license
plate shall pay to the county treasurer the logo use royalty payment.
Application for registration of a passenger vehicle or truck and issuance
of the license plate under this section shall be made by the owner or
lessee in a manner prescribed by the director of vehicles upon forms
furnished by the director.
(d) No registration or license plate issued under this section shall
be transferable to any other person.
(e) The director of vehicles may transfer a hunter nation license
plate from a leased vehicle to a purchased vehicle.
(f) Renewals of registration under this section shall be made
annually, upon payment of the fee prescribed in K.S.A. 8-143, and
amendments thereto, and in the manner prescribed in K.S.A. 8-132(b),
and amendments thereto. No renewal of registration shall be made to
any applicant until such applicant provides to the county treasurer the
annual royalty payment. If such annual royalty payment is not made to
the county treasurer, the applicant shall be required to comply with the
provisions of K.S.A. 8-143, and amendments thereto, and return the
license plate to the county treasurer of such person's residence.
(g) Hunter nation, inc., with the approval of the director of
vehicles, shall design a plate to be issued under the provisions of this
section.
(h) As a condition of receiving the hunter nation license plate and
any subsequent registration renewal of such license plate, the applicant
shall consent to the division authorizing the division's release of motor
vehicle record information, including the applicant's name, address,
royalty payment amount, plate number and vehicle type to hunter
nation, inc., and the state treasurer.

HOUSE BILL No. 2335—page 2
(i) The collection and remittance of annual royalty payments by
the county treasurer shall be subject to the provisions of K.S.A. 8-
1,141(h), and amendments thereto, except that payments from the
hunter nation license plate royalty fund shall be made on a monthly
basis to hunter nation foundation, inc.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the HOUSE, and was
adopted by that body
HOUSE adopted
Conference Committee Report
Speaker of the House.
Chief Clerk of the House.
Passed the SENATE
as amended
SENATE adopted
Conference Committee Report
President of the Senate.
Secretary of the Senate.
APPROVED
Governor.